District of Columbia statutes.
38-2401.01

Continuation of Gallaudet College as Gallaudet University.

(a)

Gallaudet University. —

The Gallaudet College created by an Act entitled “An Act to amend the charter of the Columbia Institution for the Deaf, change its name, define its corporate powers, and provide for its organization and administration, and for other purposes” is continued as a body corporate under the name of Gallaudet University. Hereafter, Gallaudet College shall be known as Gallaudet University and have perpetual succession and shall have the powers and be subject to the limitations contained in this chapter.

(b)

Purpose. —

The purpose of Gallaudet University shall be to provide education and training to individuals who are deaf and otherwise to further the education of individuals who are deaf.

Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 781, Pub. L. 99-371, § 101
Oct. 1, 1992, 106 Stat. 2151, Pub. L. 102-421, § 151(a)(1), (4)
Aug. 11, 1993, 107 Stat. 732, Pub. L. 103-73, § 203(a)
1981 Ed., § 31-1841.1.
“An Act to amend the charter of the Columbia Institution for the Deaf, change its name, define its corporate powers, and provide for its organization and administration, and for other purposes,” referred to in subsection (a), is 68 Stat. 265.